Nebraska, session 109, LB4.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB4 LB4
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 75-109.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
75-109.01 Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the
Public Service Commission shall have jurisdiction, as prescribed, over
the following subjects:
(1) Common carriers, generally, pursuant to sections 75-101 to
75-158;
(2) Grain pursuant to the Grain Dealer Act and the Grain Warehouse
Act and sections 89-1,104 to 89-1,108;
(3) Manufactured homes and recreational vehicles pursuant to the
Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles;
(4) Modular housing units pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Standards
for Modular Housing Units Act;
(5) Motor carrier registration, licensure, and safety pursuant to
sections 75-301 to 75-343, 75-369.03, 75-370, and 75-371;
(6) Pipeline carriers and rights-of-way pursuant to the Major Oil
Pipeline Siting Act, the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, and sections
75-501 to 75-503. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with
the provisions of the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, the provisions of
the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act control;
(7) Railroad carrier safety pursuant to sections 74-918, 74-919,
74-1323, and 75-401 to 75-430;
(8) Telecommunications carriers pursuant to the Automatic Dialing-
Announcing Devices Act, the Emergency Telephone Communications Systems
Act, the Enhanced Wireless 911 Services Act, the 911 Service System Act,
the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act, the Nebraska
Telecommunications Regulation Act, the Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund Act, the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation
Act, the Telecommunications Relay System Act, the Telephone Consumer
Slamming Prevention Act, sections 86-574 to 86-578, 86-1031, 86-1307, and
86-1308;
-2-

LB4 LB4
2025 2025
(9) Transmission lines and rights-of-way pursuant to sections 70-301
and 75-702 to 75-724;
(10) Water service pursuant to the Water Service Regulation Act; and
(11) Jurisdictional utilities governed by the State Natural Gas
Regulation Act. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with the
provisions of the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, the provisions of the
State Natural Gas Regulation Act control.
Sec. 2. Section 86-124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-124 (1) The commission shall not regulate the following:
(a) One-way broadcast or cable television transmission of television
or radio signals;
(b) Mobile radio services, radio paging services, and wireless
telecommunications service;
(c) Interexchange services; and
(d) Internet-protocol-enabled service and voice over Internet
protocol service, including rates, service or contract terms, conditions,
or requirements for entry for such service.
(2) This section shall not affect or modify:
(a) The enforcement of criminal or civil laws, including, but not
limited to, laws concerning consumer protection and unfair or deceptive
trade practices which apply generally to the conduct of business;
(b)(i) Any entity's obligations or rights or commission authority
under section 86-122 and under 47 U.S.C. 251 and 252, as such sections
existed on January 1, 2019, and (ii) any carrier-to-carrier tariff rates,
service quality standards, interconnection agreements, or other
obligations for which the commission has jurisdiction under state or
federal law, and (iii) service quality standards, unless an entity or one
or more of its exchanges has been deregulated pursuant to the
Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act;
(c) Any requirement to contribute to any fund administered by the
-3-

LB4 LB4
2025 2025
commission authorized by the Enhanced Wireless 911 Services Act or the
Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act;
(d) Any commission jurisdiction over intrastate switched access
rates, terms, and conditions, including the resolution of disputes
arising from, and implementation of federal and state law with respect
to, intercarrier compensation;
(e) The eligibility and requirements for the receipt of funds from
the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund and the rules,
regulations, and orders under the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal
Service Fund Act or the receipt of funds from the federal universal
service fund, regardless of the unregulated status of the provider's
service under this section;
(f) Any entity's rights and obligations with respect to (i)
registration under section 86-125, (ii) the use of public streets, roads,
highways, and rights-of-way, or (iii) a certificate of public convenience
and necessity or a permit; and
(g) The commission's authority under section 86-1029.04.
Sec. 3. Sections 3 to 13 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act.
Sec. 4. For purposes of the Telecommunications Exchange
Deregulation Act:
(1) Carrier of last resort means a facilities-based
telecommunications company, as determined by the commission, not
inconsistent with the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996, which has
the obligation to provide voice communications service, upon reasonable
request, to all residential and single-line business customers within a
defined service or geographic area;
(2) Commission means the Public Service Commission;
(3) Deregulated carrier means an electing local exchange carrier for
which all of such carrier's markets have been deregulated;
(4) Electing local exchange carrier means a telecommunications
-4-

LB4 LB4
2025 2025
company holding a certificate to offer local exchange telecommunications
services within Nebraska issued on or before February 8, 1996, or a
carrier that has received a certificate in conjunction with the
acquisition of a certificate issued on or before February 8, 1996;
(5) Transitioning carrier means an electing local exchange carrier
for which at least one, but not all, of such carrier's exchanges has been
deregulated; and
(6) Voice communications service means (a) the transmission,
conveyance, or routing of real-time, two-way voice communications to a
point or between or among points by or through any electronic, radio,
satellite, cable, optical, microwave, wireline, wireless, or other medium
or method, regardless of the protocol used; (b) the ability to receive
and terminate voice calls to and from the public switched telephone
network; or (c) voice over Internet protocol service, as defined in
section 86-121.01.
Sec. 5. (1) The commission may require disclosure of information
from telecommunications carriers as necessary to implement and enforce
the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act.
(2) The commission may maintain the confidentiality of any
information collected under the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation
Act that is claimed to be confidential for containing proprietary or
commercial information and withhold such information from public
disclosure pursuant to subdivision (3) of section 84-712.05.
Sec. 6. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of Chapters 75 and
86, only an electing local exchange carrier may initiate a proceeding to
deregulate one of such carrier's exchanges. No later than ninety days
after the date the commission receives a petition to initiate such
proceeding, the commission shall determine whether the regulated exchange
should be deregulated or remain regulated and issue a final order
classifying the exchange in accordance with this section. An electing
local exchange carrier may petition the commission to deregulate an
-5-

LB4 LB4
2025 2025
exchange of the carrier that the commission previously determined should
remain regulated upon a material change in the exchange including the
entrance of additional carriers providing voice communications service by
carriers previously operating in the exchange.
(2)(a) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this
section, the commission shall determine that an exchange should be
deregulated if:
(i) The population in the area included in the exchange is at least
one hundred thousand inhabitants; or
(ii) The population in the area included in the exchange is less
than one hundred thousand inhabitants and, in addition to the electing
local exchange carrier, there are at least two other carriers providing
voice communications service in all of the exchange.
(b) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section,
the commission may determine that an exchange should be deregulated if,
in addition to the electing local exchange carrier, at least two other
carriers are providing voice communications service in at least seventy-
five percent of the square miles in the exchange.
(c) The commission shall use federal census data from the most
recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified
count by the United States Bureau of the Census available at the time of
the application to determine the population in the area included in the
exchange under this section.
(d) If the commission deregulates an exchange under this section and
the deregulation results in a regulated carrier no longer regulated or a
transitioning carrier no longer meeting the definition of a transitioning
carrier, the commission shall issue an order reclassifying such carrier
as a deregulated carrier.
Sec. 7. (1) A deregulated carrier is not required to:
(a) Fulfill the obligations of a carrier of last resort;
(b) Comply with standards or reporting requirements related to
-6-

LB4 LB4
2025 2025
quality of service;
(c) Comply with restrictions on rates for telecommunications
services, including advanced telecommunications services, unless the
restrictions are a condition of receiving grant funds administered by the
commission or imposed for compliance with sections 86-139 to 86-157; or
(d) File an earnings report with the commission.
(2) The commission shall not provide a deregulated carrier with any
funds from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of Chapters 75 and 86, the
commission shall have only the authority over a deregulated carrier
provided under the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act. If there
is a conflict between the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act
and the other applicable provisions of Chapter 75 and 86, the
Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act shall control.
(4) Nothing in this section affects the continuing applicability of
subsection (3) of section 86-123 and section 86-124.
(5) The commission may hear complaints filed by any retail or
wholesale customers against a deregulated carrier that are in the scope
of the commission's authority provided under this section.
Sec. 8. Except as provided by section 9 of this act, a
transitioning carrier is governed by the Telecommunications Exchange
Deregulation Act and the provisions of Chapters 75 and 86 that applied to
the carrier immediately before the date the carrier was classified as a
transitioning carrier. If there is a conflict between the
Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act and other applicable
provisions of Chapters 75 and 86, the Telecommunications Exchange
Deregulation Act shall control.
Sec. 9. (1) A transitioning carrier is no longer required to do the
following in the deregulated exchange:
(a) Fulfill the obligations of a carrier of last resort;
(b) Comply with standards or reporting requirements related to
-7-

LB4 LB4
2025 2025
quality of service; or
(c) Comply with a pricing requirement unless the requirement is a
condition of receiving grant funds administered by the commission.
(2) A transitioning carrier is not eligible to receive funds from
the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund for deregulated
exchanges and the commission shall, to the extent feasible in the funding
formula, reduce a transitioning carrier's allocation of funds from the
Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund to account for
deregulated exchanges.
Sec. 10. In an exchange that remains regulated, a transitioning
carrier shall price the carrier's retail services in accordance with the
provisions that applied to that carrier immediately before the date the
carrier was classified by the commission as a transitioning carrier.
Sec. 11. Nothing in the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation
Act shall relieve a telecommunications or communications provider from
requirements in section 86-124.
Sec. 12. A telecommunications company seeking to discontinue
service in a deregulated exchange shall be exempt from subsection (1)(a)
of section 86-134. A telecommunications company seeking to discontinue
service in a deregulated exchange shall be solely subject to subsection
(1)(b) of section 86-134.
Sec. 13. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations and conduct any proceedings necessary to administer and
enforce the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act, including rules
and regulations to determine whether an exchange should remain regulated,
be deregulated, or be reregulated.
Sec. 14. Original section 86-124, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 75-109.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-8-